Hawaii statutes.
[§171-156] Beach restoration special fund.
(a) There is established in the state treasury a special fund to be designated
as the "beach restoration special fund" to carry out the purposes of
this part. The following moneys shall be deposited into the beach restoration
special fund:

(1) Proceeds from the lease or development of public
coastal lands designated pursuant to a beach restoration plan, subject to the
Hawaiian Homes Commission Act of 1920, as amended, and section 5(f) of the
Admission Act of 1959;

(2) Proceeds from the lease of public lands pursuant
to this part for an existing seawall or revetment;

(3) Fines collected for unauthorized shoreline
structures on state submerged land or conservation district land;

(4) Appropriations made by the legislature for
deposit into this fund;

(5) Donations and contributions made by private
individuals or organizations for deposit into this fund;

(6) Fees collected for the processing of applications
for coastal and beach erosion control projects; and

(7) Grants provided by governmental agencies or any
other source.

(b) The beach restoration special fund may be
used by the department for one or more of the following purposes:

(1) Planning, designing, development, or
implementation of beach restoration projects pursuant to this part; and

(2) Providing grants to the counties, nongovernmental
organizations, and the University of Hawaii for the restoration of beach lands
and for research or engineering studies necessary to support beach restoration
projects, subject to this part. [L 1999, c 84, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next